Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202669-2403
Sale, lease, rental, and transfer; certificate required; exceptions.

(1) Except as provided in this section, a person shall not:

(a) Purchase, lease, rent, or receive transfer of a handgun until he or she has obtained a certificate in accordance with section 69-2404; or

(b) Sell, lease, rent, or transfer a handgun to a person who has not obtained a certificate.

(2) The certificate shall not be required if:

(a) The person acquiring the handgun is a licensed firearms dealer under federal law;

(b) The handgun is an antique handgun;

(c) The person acquiring the handgun is authorized to do so on behalf of a law enforcement agency;

(d) The transfer is a temporary transfer of a handgun and the transferee remains (i) in the line of sight of the transferor or (ii) within the premises of an established shooting facility;

(e) The transfer is between a person and his or her spouse, sibling, parent, child, aunt, uncle, niece, nephew, or grandparent;

(f) The person acquiring the handgun is a holder of a valid permit under the Concealed Handgun Permit Act; or

(g) The person acquiring the handgun is a peace officer as defined in section 69-2429.

Laws 1991, LB 355, § 2;

Laws 2010, LB817, § 4;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 99.

Concealed Handgun Permit Act, see section 69-2427.